Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-885.33
Subdivision real estate; sale or offer to sell; requirements.

It shall be unlawful for any person, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation to sell or offer for sale any real estate in a subdivision except by a broker and his or her employees duly licensed in this state.

Laws 1973, LB 68, § 33;

Laws 1983, LB 182, § 24;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 534;

Laws 2002, LB 863, § 21.